Wisconsin, session 2025, SB191.
do enact as follows:SB191,14Section 1. 885.035 of the statutes is created to read:SB191,2,21885.035 Service of subpoena to law enforcement officer. (1) In this 2section:SB191,2,33(a) “Law enforcement officer” has the meaning given in s. 165.85 (2) (c).SB191,2,44(b) “Tribal law enforcement officer” has the meaning given in s. 165.85 (2) (g).SB191,2,105(2) Notwithstanding s. 885.03, a subpoena to be served upon a law 6enforcement officer or tribal law enforcement officer in the officer’s official capacity 7as a law enforcement officer or tribal law enforcement officer may be served only at 8the law enforcement officer’s or tribal law enforcement officer’s work address. The 9subpoena may be served by exhibiting and reading it to the officer, by giving the 10officer a copy thereof, or by leaving a copy at the officer’s work address.SB191,2,1111